Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2915
Resignation of agent for service of process.

(1) To resign as an agent for service of process of a limited cooperative association or a foreign limited cooperative association, the agent shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of resignation containing the name of the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association.

(2) After receiving a statement of resignation, the Secretary of State shall file it and mail a copy to the principal office of the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association and another copy to the principal office if the address of the principal office appears in the records of the Secretary of State and is different from the address of the registered office.

(3) An agency for service of process terminates thirty days after the Secretary of State files the statement of resignation.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 15.